Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1837.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Underground storage tank revolving fund; use of monies Notwithstanding any other law, in fiscal year 2026-2027, the department of environmental quality may use up to $6,531,000 from the underground storage tank revolving fund established by section 49-1015, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2026-2027 for: 1. Administrative costs of the department. 2. Remediating sewage discharge issues in Naco, Arizona and other border areas of this state. Sec. 2. Arizona water banking fund; use of monies In addition to the purposes provided in section 45-2425, Arizona Revised Statutes, monies appropriated to the Arizona navigable stream adjudication commission from the Arizona water banking fund established by section 45-2425, Arizona Revised Statutes, may be used in fiscal year 2026-2027 to pay legal fees. Sec. 3. Arizona water protection fund; use of monies Notwithstanding section 45-2114, Arizona Revised Statutes, in fiscal year 2026-2027, the Arizona water protection fund commission may grant to the department of water resources up to $336,000 of the unobligated balance in the Arizona water protection fund established by section 45-2111, Arizona Revised Statutes, to pay for administrative costs of the department in fiscal year 2026-2027. Sec. 4. Department of environmental quality; vehicle emissions testing fees; definition A. Notwithstanding any other law, in fiscal year 2026-2027, the director of the department of environmental quality shall maintain fees for tests conducted in area A at the area A emission fee level as of June 30, 2025. B. For the purposes of this subsection, "area A" has the same meaning prescribed in section 49-541, Arizona Revised Statutes. Sec. 5. Appropriation limit; water quality assurance revolving fund Notwithstanding section 49-282, Arizona Revised Statutes, the appropriation from the state general fund to the water quality assurance revolving fund established by section 49-282, Arizona Revised Statutes, for fiscal year 2026-2027 may not exceed $15,000,000.